Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.335 RCW to read as follows:(1) The board of directors of a school district with an estimated ending fund balance for the fiscal year equaling three percent or less of its estimated total revenues for the same fiscal year may request from the superintendent of public instruction authorization to sell real property of the district. The superintendent of public instruction, subject to the following conditions, may only grant the authorization if the school district demonstrates to the satisfaction of the superintendent of public instruction that:(a) The sale is necessary to restore financial stability;(b) The sale is necessary to prevent adverse impacts to student learning; and(c) The proceeds from the sale will be used only for alleviating or concluding the financial burdens that caused or significantly contributed to inability of the school district to assure its financial solvency.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section that include provisions to ensure transparency and accountability, and to verify that the school district's use of the proceeds from any sale of real property aligns with the terms of the authorization. The rules required by this section must also prohibit a school district from receiving an authorization provided under this section or RCW 28A.335.135 more than once during a five-year period.(3) Nothing in this section exempts or shall be construed as exempting school districts from complying with the applicable requirements of RCW 8.16.170 when selling real property acquired through condemnation under chapter 8.16 RCW.Sec. 2. RCW 28A.335.120 and 2025 c 384 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board of directors of any school district of this state may:(a) Sell for cash, at public or private sale, and convey by deed all interest of the district in or to any of the real property of the district which is no longer required for school purposes or which has been authorized for sale as provided in RCW 28A.335.135 or section 1 of this act or by a financial oversight committee established under RCW 28A.315.221; and(b) Purchase real property for the purpose of locating thereon and affixing thereto any house or houses and appurtenant buildings removed from school sites owned by the district and sell for cash, at public or private sale, and convey by deed all interest of the district in or to such acquired and improved real property.(2) When the board of directors of any school district proposes a sale of school district real property pursuant to this section and the value of the property exceeds seventy thousand dollars, the board shall publish a notice of its intention to sell the property. The notice shall be published at least once each week during two consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper with a general circulation in the area in which the school district is located. The notice shall describe the property to be sold and designate the place where and the day and hour when a hearing will be held. The board shall hold a public hearing upon the proposal to dispose of the school district property at the place and the day and hour fixed in the notice and admit evidence offered for and against the propriety and advisability of the proposed sale.(3) The board of directors of any school district desiring to sell surplus real property shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district. School districts shall not sell the property for at least forty-five days following the publication of the newspaper notice.(4) Private schools shall have the same rights as any other person or entity to submit bids for the purchase of surplus real property and to have such bids considered along with all other bids.(5) Any sale of school district real property authorized pursuant to this section shall be preceded by a market value appraisal by a professionally designated real estate appraiser or a general real estate appraiser certified under chapter 18.140 RCW selected by the board of directors and no sale shall take place if the sale price would be less than ninety percent of the appraisal made by the real estate appraiser: PROVIDED, That if the property has been on the market for one year or more the property may be reappraised and sold for not less than seventy-five percent of the reappraised value with the unanimous consent of the board.(6) If in the judgment of the board of directors of any district the sale of real property of the district not needed for school purposes would be facilitated and greater value realized through use of the services of licensed real estate brokers, a contract for such services may be negotiated and concluded: PROVIDED, That the use of a licensed real estate broker will not eliminate the obligation of the board of directors to provide the notice described in this section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the fee or commissions charged for any broker services shall not exceed seven percent of the resulting sale value for a single parcel: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any professionally designated real estate appraiser or a general real estate appraiser certified under chapter 18.140 RCW selected by the board to appraise the market value of a parcel of property to be sold may not be a party to any contract with the school district to sell such parcel of property for a period of three years after the appraisal.(7) If in the judgment of the board of directors of any district the sale of real property of the district not needed for school purposes would be facilitated and greater value realized through sale on contract terms, a real estate sales contract may be executed between the district and buyer.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.335.130 and 2025 c 384 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:The proceeds from any sale of school district real property by a board of directors shall be deposited to the debt service fund and/or the capital projects fund, except for:(1) Amounts required to be expended for the costs associated with the sale of such property, which moneys may be deposited into the fund from which the expenditure was incurred;(2) Amounts authorized by a financial oversight committee established under RCW 28A.315.221 to be deposited into a different fund;(3) As provided in RCW 28A.335.240(1); ((or))(4) As provided in RCW 28A.335.135; or(5) As provided in section 1 of this act.--- END ---